src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no



! ===========================
!! # Adjective affixes
! ===========================

!! This file contains the morphology for the Inari Saami adjectives.

!! The morphophonological processes are governed by triggers. When there are more
!! triggers, tney must be ordered as follows (where {A,B} C means *A or B, thereafter C*):

!! {SV,ÁE,ÁI}  SC  FCD {WG,CSH} CLEN  {VHIGH,VBACK}  {RVSH,RLEN} EA {SLEN,SVSH}  SVLOW


!LEXICON adjstems    __@CODE@__ temporary, for stems waiting for a lexicon
!+A+Attr: K ;	    
!+A+Sg+Nom: K ;	    
!+A+Cmp/Attr:  ATTR ;

!! ## Adjectives with attr only

LEXICON ATTR !!≈ **@CODE@** for stems with only attribute form, gives Attr, svt. sends to Cmp.
+A+Attr:  K ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:  ATTR_R ;
+A: A_LASJ ;         ! rähislâš
+A+Attr: A_VUOTA ;   ! vuoigâvuotâ


!! ## Even-syllable stems
! -------------------


LEXICON SIAHA !!≈ **@CODE@** for siähá. It gives only Attr and Sg/Pl Nom. Fix?
+A+Attr:  K ;
+A+Sg+Nom:  K ;
+A+Pl+Nom:  K ;



!LEXICON UCES   __@CODE@__ , not in use
!+A+Attr:â K ;     !attr. uccâ
!+A+Sg+Nom:e^WG%>s K ;
!+A:es%> COMP ;
!+A:e^WG%> MUS ;
!+A:e%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A+Attr:â%> A_VUOTA ; !existing?
!+A+Cmp/Attr:â ATTR_R ; !uccârávdu


!LEXICON POCCA !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_ALGA, attr počis
!+A+Attr:i^WG%>s K ; ! the final a > 0, počis
!+A+Attr+Err/Orth:â^WG%>s K ; ! corp: počâs
!+A:â X_ALGA ;
!+A:â^WGb COMPe ;
!+A:^WGâ%> MUS ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:â ATTR_R ; !poččâmielâst
!+A+Cmp/Attr:â^WG%>s ATTR_R ; !
!+A+Cmp/Attr:i^WG%>s ATTR_R ; !
!+A:â%> A_VUOTA ; !poččâvuođâ


LEXICON SKELMA !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_ALGA, attr skelmâ
+A+Attr: K ;
+A: X_ALGA ;
+A:b^WG COMPe ;
+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^WG^RLEN%>ht K ;



!LEXICON VANTTA !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_ALGA, attr vantâs
!+A+Attr:^CSH%>s K ; !vantâs !poččâ počis počâs
!+A: X_ALGA ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:^CSH%>s ATTR_R ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A:b^WG COMPe ;
!+A:^WG%> MUS ;


!LEXICON A_2VADDU  !!≈ __@CODE@__ check this
!+A+Attr: K ;
!+A: X_VADDU ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A:^WG%> COMPe ;
!+A:^WG^RLEN%> MUS ;

!LEXICON A_2KIELA  !!≈ __@CODE@__ check this
!+A+Attr: K ;
!+A: X_KIELA ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A:^WG%> COMP ;
!+A:^WG%> MUS ;
!

!LEXICON SKELMA_COMMON 
!+A+Sg+Nom: K ;
!+A+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;
!+A+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;
!+A+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;
!+A+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;
!+A+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in K ;
!+A+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;
!+A+Ess:%>n K ;
!+A+Par:%>d K ;
!+A+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ;
!+A+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i K ;
!+A+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;
!+A+Pl+Ill:^WG^SVLOW%>id K ;
!+A+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in K ;
!+A+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ;
!+A+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá K ;



!LEXICON HIAJU !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_VUAGGU, attr. hiäjus
!+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH%>s K ; ! hiäjus
!+A: X_VUAGGU ;
!+A:b^WG%> COMPe ;
!+A:^WG^RVSH%> MUS ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ; 
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;

 
LEXICON CEPPI !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_AIGI, attr. čepis
+A+Attr:^WG%>s K ;
+A: X_AIGI ;
+A:b^WG COMPe ;
+A:p^WG P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ; !
+A+Cmp/SgNom: R ; !luággijuolgijd herkkičuávjásiih
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:^WG%>s A_LAGAN ; !ärgislágán
!+A:l A_ADV ; !how? tärkkilávt blo
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^WG^RLEN%>ht K ;

LEXICON UCCE !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr+Use/NG:e^WG%>s K ;
+A+Attr+Use/NG:e^WG%>s ATTR_R ;
+A+Attr:â K ;
+A:e X_ALGE ;
+A:e^SVb^WG COMPclen ;
!+A+Err/Orth:eb^WG COMPe ;
+A:e^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:â ATTR_R ;
+A:e%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^WG^CLEN%>eeht K ;

LEXICON SUVRE !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A+Attr: K ;	! suvre
+A: X_ALGE ;
+A:^SVb^WG COMPclen ;
+A+Err/Orth:b^WG COMPe ;
+A:p^WG P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^SVp^WG P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^RLEN%>ht K ;


LEXICON KUKKE !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_ALGE, attr. kuhes
+A+Attr:^WG%>s K ;
+A: X_ALGE ;
+A:^SVb^WG COMPclen ;
+A+Err/Orth:b^WG COMPe ;
+A:p^WG P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^SVp^WG P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^WG^CLEN%>eht K ;


!LEXICON HUMO !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_NJUNE, attr. humos
!+A+Attr:^WG%>s K ;
!+A: X_NJUNE ;
!+A:b COMPclen ;	! hummoob; humobeht
!+A:p P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
!+A:^WG%> MUS ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ;
!+A+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;


LEXICON PASE !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_NJUNE via HUMO_REST, attr. pase                  
+A+Attr: K ;
+A: X_NJUNE ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A:^SVb^WG PASE_cmpsuf ; ! huumoob; humobeht
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:^SVb^WGâš K ; !needs lexicon
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^SVb^WGbeht K ; !čepibeht	čeppi čeepib čepibeht
+A:p P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>ht K ; !huumooht, loojeeht
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;

LEXICON PASE_cmpsuf 
+Sg+Nom:^CLEN K ;
+Sg+Gen:^CLEN K ;
+Sg+Acc:^CLEN K ;
+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>ân K ;
+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>ist K ;
+Sg+Com:^SLEN%>áin K ;
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;
+Ess:^SLEN%>in K ;
+Par:^SLEN%>id K ;
 :^SLEN X_eh_PL ;
+Err/Orth: X_eh_PL ;

LEXICON HUMO !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_NJUNE via HUMO_REST, attr. humos                  
+A+Attr:^WG%>s K ;
HUMO_REST ;

LEXICON HUMO_REST !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A: X_NJUNE ;
+A:^SVb^WG COMPe ; ! huumoob; humobeht                                           
+A:p P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%>s ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>ht K ; !huumooht, loojeeht
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;


LEXICON UAMI !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_SAAMI, attr. uá'mi
+A+Attr:  K ; !uámi
+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
LAAMI_REST ;

LEXICON LAAMI !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_SAAMI, attr. lämis
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH%>s  K ; !lämis
+A+Cmp/Attr:s ATTR_R ;
LAAMI_REST ;

LEXICON LAAMI_REST !!≈ **@CODE@** 
+A: X_SAAMI	  ;
+A:b^WG COMPe ;	! läämib (WG); lämibeht
+A:^WG^RVSH%> MUS ;
+A:^CSH%> A_VUOTA ; ! lämivuotâ
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^WG%>ht K ; ! lämibeht komparatiiva


LEXICON PYERI !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_KYELI, attr. pyeri
+A+Attr:i3  K ; 
+A:i3 X_KYELI	  ;
+A:e^SV^WG eCOMP ; ! pyereeb; pyerebeht

!+A:e^WG%> eCOMP ; ! pyereeb; pyerebeht
+A:e^WG MUS ;
+A:i3%> A_VUOTA ; !pyerivuotâ pyereebvuotân
+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:e^SV^WG%>est K ;


LEXICON HYENI !!≈ **@CODE@** se^RVl^RC directing to X_KYELI, attr. hyenes
+A+Attr:e^WG%>s  K ; 
+A:i3^RLEN X_KYELI	  ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:ee^WG^RLENb K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:ee^WG^RLENb K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:ee^WG^RLENb K ;
+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A: HYENI_COMP_ADVLCASE  ;

+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:e^SV^WG^RLENbeht K ; 
+A:e^WG MUS ;
+A:i3%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:e^WG%>s ATTR_R ; 
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:e^SV^WG%>eht K ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:e^SV^WG%>est K ;

! +A:e^SV^WG^RLEN eCOMP ; ! hyeneeb; hyenebeht, seeleeb

LEXICON HYENI_COMP_ADVLCASE
+Sg+Ill:e^WGb%>ân K ;              ! njeđebân
+Sg+Loc:e^WGb%>ist K ;             ! njeđebist
+Sg+Com:e^WGb%>áin K ;             ! njeđebáin
+Sg+Abe:ee^WG^RLENb^SLEN%>ttáá K ; ! njeeđeebttää
+Ess:e^WG^RLENb%>in K ;            ! njeđebin
+Par:e^WG^RLENb%>id K ;            ! njeđebid
    :e^WGb X_eh_PL ; ! check this
