src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** is the list of adjectives
suvre:su^RVvre SUVRE "hapan" ; 
rijjâ:ri^RVjjâ SKELMA ;
läämi:lääm^RCi LAAMI "invalidi" ; ! VV X V	!&láámmásáin, lámásist, lámásân, láámmás
ubâ:ubâ ATTR "koko" ;
puigâ:pu^RVi4gâ ATTR "ehta" ; !! Lyhentynyt attr.
sierâ:sierâ ATTR "erillinen" ;
hirmâd:hirmâd ATTR "hirveä" ;
poččâ:po^RVččâ CEPPI "katkera" ;
ucce:u^RVcc UCCE ;
čeppi:če^RVppi CEPPI "fiksu" ; !¢ čeppijn, čeepist, čiäpán, čeepi, attr. čepis !YAML
herkki:he^RVrkki CEPPI "herkkä" ; !¢ herkkijn, heerkist, hiärkán, heerki, attr. herkis ! kk:k, attr. herkis,  !KIRKKO: kirho kirhoost YAML
humo:hu^RVm^RCo HUMO "hupsu" ; !¢ humoin, huumoost, humon, humo
hyeni:hyen^RC HYENI "huono" ; !¢ huonijn, hyeneest, huánán, hyene, attr. hyenes
njeeđi:nje^RVđ^RC HYENI "matalalaitainen" ; ! attr. njeđes
hälbi:hä^RVlbi CEPPI "halpa" ; !¢ halbijn, häälbist, háálbán, häälbi
kezzi:ke^RVzzi CEPPI "kapea" ; !¢ kezzijn, keezist, kiäzán, keezi
sävri:sä^RVvri CEPPI "hyväkuntoinen" ;
kume:ku^RVm^RCe PASE "helle" ; !¢ kuumijn, kuumeest, kumán, kume
jollâ:jo^RVllâ CEPPI "hullu" ; !¢ jolláin, joolâst, joolân, joolâ, attr. jolâs
julme:ju^RVlme KUKKE "julma" ; !¢ julmijn, julmeest, juulmán, julme
loje:lo^RVj^RCe HUMO "kesy" ; !¢ loojeest, loján, loje
kalje:ka^RVlje KUKKE "kesy" ; !¢
pase:pa^RVs^RCe PASE "pyhä" ;
nyeski:nyeski CEPPI "hävytön" ; !¢ nuoskijn, nyeskist, nuáskán, nyeski
hävski:hä^RVvski CEPPI ; !¢ hävskis
pyeidi:pyei4di CEPPI "lihava" ; !¢ puoidijn, pyeidist, puáidán, pyeidi
kievhi:kievhi CEPPI "köyhä" ; !¢ kievhijn, kievhist, kiävhán, kievhi
ärgi:ä^RVrgi CEPPI "arka" ; !¢ argijn, äärgist, áárgán, äärgi
šlunde:šlu^RVnde KUKKE "apea" ; !¢ šlundijn, šlundeest, šluundán, šlunde
hiälppu:hiälppu CEPPI "helppo" ; !¢
huáppu:huáppu CEPPI "" ;
luáni:luán^RCi CEPPI "heikkotahtoinen" ; !¢ loonijn, luánist, luánán, luáni ! HUMO gives luániist
pyeri:pyer^RC PYERI "hyvä" ;  !corp: pyerrin pyeremus, attr. pyeri
tolcce:to^RVlcce KUKKE "penseä" ;
narcce:na^RVrcce KUKKE "kitukasvuinen" ;
kuje:ku^RVj^RCe HUMO "vihlova" ;
kukke:ku^RVkk4e KUKKE "pitkä" ; !YAML
pelikukke:peli#ku^RVkk4e KUKKE "pitkä" ; !YAML
tušše:tu^RVšše KUKKE "turha" ; ! attr tušes
pulske:pu^RVlske KUKKE "pulska" ;
tuhme:tu^RVhme KUKKE "tuhma" ;
rome:ro^RVm^RCe HUMO "törkeä" ;
uine:u^RVi4ne KUKKE "ujo" ;
faste:fa^RVste KUKKE "ruma" ;
cabze:ca^RVbze KUKKE "täpärä" ;
tärkki:tä^RVrkk4i CEPPI "tarkka" ; ! attr. tärhis
metki:me^RVtk4i CEPPI "4-jalk" ;
väŋkki:vä^RVŋkki CEPPI "vankka" ;
uámi:uám^RCi UAMI "oma" ;
läivi:lä^RVi4vi CEPPI "laimea" ;
kärži:kä^RVrži CEPPI "suppea" ;
huámášekkis:huámášekkis ATTR "hienotunteinen" ;
ohtuunis:ohtuunis ATTR "yksinäinen" ;
skiälgá:skiälgá SKELMA "kierosilmäinen" ;
skelmâ:ske^RVlmâ SKELMA "ovela" ;
fastâ:fa^RVstâ ATTR "vakituinen" ;
ruoššâ:ruoššâ SKELMA "venäläinen" ;
sänitärkki:säni#tä^RVrkk4i CEPPI ;
sämikiel:sämi#kiel ATTR ;
tulcce:tu^RVlcce KUKKE "tylsä" ;
idde:i^RVdde KUKKE ;
olmâ ATTR ;
nuuvtkočodum ATTR ;
paha:pah5a CEPPI "paha" ;	! attr. pahas
härvi:hä^RVrvi CEPPI "harva" ;
skäävi:skääv^RCi LAAMI "hämärä" ;
ujo:u^RVj^RCo HUMO "ujo" ;
tommittáá ATTR ;
váháš ATTR ;
korrekt ATTR ;
hyperkorrekt ATTR ;
kievrâ:ki5evrâ CEPPI ;
oovtâkiel:oovtâ#kiel ATTR ;
suomâkiel:suomâ#kiel ATTR ;
anarâškiel:anarâš#kiel ATTR ;
ruoŧâkiel:ruoŧâ#kiel ATTR ;
pajekiel:paje#kiel ATTR ;
orjâlâškiel:orjâlâš#kiel ATTR ;
läättinkiel:läättin#kiel ATTR ;
vuáđusämikiel:vuáđu#sämi#kiel ATTR ;
vuoigâ ATTR ; !! 
fakkâ ATTR ;
eeđâb:eeđâb ATTR "" ; !from bidix
raše:ra^RVš^RCe HUMO "" ; !from bidix
njuáci:njuác^RCi LAAMI "" ; !from bidix
suámi:suám^RCi LAAMI "" ; !from bidix
prelimináár:prelimináár ATTR ;
ruotâkiel:ruotâ#kiel ATTR ;
nuorttâkiel:nuorttâ#kiel ATTR ;
sile:si^RVl^RCe HUMO ; !Erika added from bidix
vale:va^RVl^RCe HUMO ; !from bidix
čyerbi:čyerbi CEPPI "" ; !Erika added from bidix
vieksâ:viek4s^RCâ CEPPI ;
kiähnu:kiähnu CEPPI ; !CEPPI
käcci:kä^RVcci CEPPI ; 
luážži:luážži CEPPI "" ;
läbžiloje:läbži#lo^RVj^RCe HUMO ;	
nyeli:nyel^RC PYERI ;
pyeši:pyeš^RCi LAAMI ;
ranttu:ra^RVnttu CEPPI ; !CEPPI ^RV
saivâ:sa^RVi4vâ SKELMA ; !   
seeli:se^RVl^RC HYENI ;
tuihme:tu^RVi4hme KUKKE ; ! # tuihmes
uárnji:uárnji CEPPI ;
uárŋi:uárŋi CEPPI ;
vaste:va^RVste KUKKE "ruma" ;
veeri:veer^RC PYERI "väärä" ; 
skolmo:sko^RVlmo SUVRE ;
